North Dakota statutes. TITLE 38 Mining and Gas and Oil Production
CHAPTER 38-08 Control of Gas and Oil Resources
38-08-05.
Drilling permit required.

A person may not commence operations for the drilling of a well for oil or gas without obtaining a permit from the industrial commission under rules as may be adopted by the commission and paying to the commission a fee for each well in an amount to be determined by the commission. The applicant shall provide notice to the owner of any permanently occupied dwelling located within one thousand three hundred twenty feet [402.34 meters] of the proposed oil or gas well.

Unless waived by the owner or if the commission determines that the well location is reasonably necessary to prevent waste or to protect correlative rights, the commission may not issue a drilling permit for an oil or gas well that will be located within five hundred feet [152.4 meters] of an occupied dwelling. If the commission issues a drilling permit for a location within one thousand feet [300.48 meters] of an occupied dwelling, the commission may impose conditions on the permit:

For wells permitted on new pads built after July 31, 2013, the conditions imposed under this subdivision may include, upon request of the owner of the permanently occupied dwelling, requiring that the location of all flares, tanks, and treaters utilized in connection with the permitted well be located at a greater distance from the occupied dwelling than the oil and gas well bore if the location can be accommodated reasonably within the proposed pad location; or

As the commission determines reasonably necessary to minimize impact to the owner of the occupied dwelling.

Source:

S.L. 1953, ch. 227, § 6; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 38-0805; S.L. 1977, ch. 318, § 1; 1981, ch. 365, § 2; 1983, ch. 396, § 4; 2007, ch. 311, § 1; 2013, ch. 278, § 1.

Effective Date.

The 2013 amendment of this section by section 1 of chapter 278, S.L. 2013 became effective August 1, 2013.

Law Reviews.

Note: EPA Launches Hydraulic Fracturing Study to Investigate Health and Environmental Concerns While North Dakota Resists Regulation: Should Citizens Be Concerned?, 87 N.D. L. Rev. 717 (2011).

38-08-06.
Commission shall determine market demand and regulate the amount of production.

The commission shall determine market demand for each marketing district and regulate the amount of production as follows:

The commission shall limit the production of oil and gas within each marketing district to that amount which can be produced without waste, and which does not exceed the reasonable market demand.

Whenever the commission limits the total amount of oil or gas which may be produced in the state or a marketing district, the commission shall allocate or distribute the allowable production among the pools therein on a reasonable basis, giving, where reasonable under the circumstances to each pool with small wells of settled production, an allowable production which prevents the general premature abandonment of such wells in the pool.

Whenever the commission limits the total amount of oil or gas which may be produced in any pool in this state to an amount less than that amount which the pool could produce if no restriction was imposed, which limitation is imposed either incidental to, or without, a limitation of the total amount of oil or gas produced in the marketing district wherein the pool is located, the commission shall allocate or distribute the allowable production among the several wells or producing properties in the pool on a reasonable basis, preventing or minimizing reasonable avoidable drainage, so that each property will have the opportunity to produce or to receive its just and equitable share, subject to the reasonable necessities for the prevention of waste.

In allocating the market demand for gas as between pools within marketing districts, the commission shall give due regard to the fact that gas produced from oil pools is to be regulated in a manner as will protect the reasonable use of its energy for oil production.

The commission is not required to determine the reasonable market demand applicable to any single pool, except in relation to all other pools within the same marketing district, and in relation to the demand applicable to the marketing district. In allocating allowables to pools, the commission may consider, but is not bound by, nominations of purchasers to purchase from particular fields, pools, or portions thereof. The commission shall allocate the total allowable for the state in such manner as prevents undue discrimination between marketing districts, fields, pools, or portions thereof resulting from selective buying or nomination by purchasers.

Source:

S.L. 1953, ch. 227, § 7; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 38-0806; S.L. 1961, ch. 250, § 2.

38-08-06.1.
Natural gas well status determinations and findings. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1997, ch. 318, § 1.

38-08-06.2.
Discrimination in the processing and purchasing of gas prohibited.

Gas produced in this state must be processed and purchased without discrimination between producers in the same reservoir, recognizing the right of the purchaser to establish reasonable quality standards for acceptance of gas, which must be applied without discrimination among producers. After notice and hearing, for good cause, the commission may relieve any person of the duty to process and purchase gas produced in this state without discrimination.

Source:

S.L. 1983, ch. 399, § 1.

38-08-06.3.
Information statement to accompany payment to royalty owner — Penalty.

Any person who makes a payment to an owner of a royalty interest in land in this state for the purchase of oil or gas produced from that royalty interest shall provide with the payment to the royalty owner an information statement that will allow the royalty owner to clearly identify the amount of oil or gas sold and the amount and purpose of each deduction made from the gross amount due. The statement must be on forms approved by the industrial commission and contain the information that the commission prescribes by rule. A person who fails to comply with the requirements of this section is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.

Source:

S.L. 1983, ch. 400, § 1.

Cross-References.

Classification of offenses, penalties, see N.D.C.C. § 12.1-32-01.

38-08-06.4.
Flaring of gas restricted — Imposition of tax — Payment of royalties — Industrial commission authority.

As permitted under rules of the industrial commission, gas produced with crude oil from an oil well may be flared during a one-year period from the date of first production from the well.

After the time period in subsection 1, flaring of gas from the well must cease and the well must be:

Capped;

Connected to a gas gathering line;

Equipped with an electrical generator that consumes at least seventy-five percent of the gas from the well;

Equipped with a system that intakes at least seventy-five percent of the gas and natural gas liquids volume from the well for beneficial consumption by means of compression to liquid for use as fuel, transport to a processing facility, production of petrochemicals or fertilizer, conversion to liquid fuels, separating and collecting over fifty percent of the propane and heavier hydrocarbons; or

Equipped with other value-added processes as approved by the industrial commission which reduce the volume or intensity of the flare by more than sixty percent.

An electrical generator and its attachment units to produce electricity from gas and a collection system described in subdivision d of subsection 2 must be considered to be personal property for all purposes.

For a well operated in violation of this section, the producer shall pay royalties to royalty owners upon the value of the flared gas and shall also pay gross production tax on the flared gas at the rate imposed under section 57-51-02.2.

The industrial commission may enforce this section and, for each well operator found to be in violation of this section, may determine the value of flared gas for purposes of payment of royalties under this section and its determination is final.

A producer may obtain an exemption from this section from the industrial commission upon application that shows to the satisfaction of the industrial commission that connection of the well to a natural gas gathering line is economically infeasible at the time of the application or in the foreseeable future or that a market for the gas is not available and that equipping the well with an electrical generator to produce electricity from gas or employing a collection system described in subdivision d of subsection 2 is economically infeasible.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 401, § 1; 1993, ch. 368, § 1; 2009, ch. 574, § 1; 2013, ch. 472, § 1.

Effective Date.

The 2013 amendment of this section by section 1 of chapter 472, S.L. 2013 became effective July 1, 2013.

38-08-07.
Commission shall set spacing units.

The commission shall set spacing units as follows:

When necessary to prevent waste, to avoid the drilling of unnecessary wells, or to protect correlative rights, the commission shall establish spacing units for a pool. Spacing units when established must be of uniform size and shape for the entire pool, except that when found to be necessary for any of the purposes above mentioned, the commission is authorized to divide any pool into zones and establish spacing units for each zone, which units may differ in size and shape from those established in any other zone.

The size and shape of spacing units are to be such as will result in the efficient and economical development of the pool as a whole.

An order establishing spacing units for a pool must specify the size and shape of each unit and the location of the permitted well thereon in accordance with a reasonably uniform spacing plan. Upon application, if the commission finds that a well drilled at the prescribed location would not produce in paying quantities, that surface conditions would substantially add to the burden or hazard of drilling such well, or that the drilling of such well at a location other than the prescribed location is otherwise necessary either to protect correlative rights, to prevent waste, or to effect greater ultimate recovery of oil and gas, the commission is authorized to enter an order permitting the well to be drilled at a location other than that prescribed by such spacing order; however, the commission shall include in the order suitable provisions to prevent the production from the spacing unit of more than its just and equitable share of the oil and gas in the pool.

An order establishing units for a pool must cover all lands determined or believed to be underlaid by such pool, and may be modified by the commission from time to time to include additional areas determined to be underlaid by such pool. When found necessary for the prevention of waste, or to avoid the drilling of unnecessary wells, or to protect correlative rights, an order establishing spacing units in a pool may be modified by the commission to increase or decrease the size of spacing units in the pool or any zone thereof, or to permit the drilling of additional wells on a reasonably uniform plan in the pool, or any zone thereof, or an additional well on any spacing unit thereof.

Source:

S.L. 1953, ch. 227, § 8; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 38-0807; S.L. 1977, ch. 319, § 1; 1981, ch. 365, § 3; 1989, ch. 436, § 1.

38-08-08.
Integration of fractional tracts.

When two or more separately owned tracts are embraced within a spacing unit, or when there are separately owned interests in all or a part of the spacing unit, then the owners and royalty owners thereof may pool their interests for the development and operation of the spacing unit. In the absence of voluntary pooling, the commission upon the application of any interested person shall enter an order pooling all interests in the spacing unit for the development and operations thereof. Each such pooling order must be made after notice and hearing, and must be upon terms and conditions that are just and reasonable, and that afford to the owner of each tract or interest in the spacing unit the opportunity to recover or receive, without unnecessary expense, that owner’s just and equitable share. Operations incident to the drilling of a well upon any portion of a spacing unit covered by a pooling order must be deemed, for all purposes, the conduct of such operations upon each separately owned tract in the drilling unit by the several owners thereof. That portion of the production allocated to each tract included in a spacing unit covered by a pooling order must, when produced, be deemed for all purposes to have been produced from such tract by a well drilled thereon. For the purposes of this section and section 38-08-10, any unleased mineral interest pooled by virtue of this section before August 1, 2009, is entitled to a cost-free royalty interest equal to the acreage weighted average royalty interest of the leased tracts within the spacing unit, but in no event may the royalty interest of an unleased tract be less than a one-eighth interest. An unleased mineral interest pooled after July 31, 2009, is entitled to a cost-free royalty interest equal to the acreage weighted average royalty interest of the leased tracts within the spacing unit or, at the operator’s election, a cost-free royalty interest of sixteen percent. The remainder of the unleased interest must be treated as a lessee or cost-bearing interest.

Each such pooling order must make provision for the drilling and operation of a well on the spacing unit, and for the payment of the reasonable actual cost thereof by the owners of interests in the spacing unit, plus a reasonable charge for supervision. In the event of any dispute as to such costs, the commission shall determine the proper costs. If one or more of the owners shall drill and operate, or pay the expenses of drilling and operating the well for the benefit of others, then, the owner or owners so drilling or operating shall, upon complying with the terms of section 38-08-10, have a lien on the share of production from the spacing unit accruing to the interest of each of the other owners for the payment of the owner’s or owners’ proportionate share of such expenses. All the oil and gas subject to the lien must be marketed and sold and the proceeds applied in payment of the expenses secured by such lien as provided for in section 38-08-10.

In addition to any costs and charges recoverable under subsections 1 and 2, if the owner of an interest in a spacing unit elects not to participate in the risk and cost of drilling a well thereon, the owner paying for the nonparticipating owner’s share of the drilling and operation of a well may recover from the nonparticipating owner a risk penalty for the risk involved in drilling the well. The recovery of a risk penalty is as follows:

If the nonparticipating owner’s interest in the spacing unit is derived from a lease or other contract for development, the risk penalty is two hundred percent of the nonparticipating owner’s share of the reasonable actual costs of drilling and completing the well and may be recovered out of, and only out of, production from the pooled spacing unit, as provided by section 38-08-10, exclusive of any royalty or overriding royalty.

If the nonparticipating owner’s interest in the spacing unit is not subject to a lease or other contract for development, the risk penalty is fifty percent of the nonparticipating owner’s share of the reasonable actual costs of drilling and completing the well and may be recovered out of production from the pooled spacing unit, as provided by section 38-08-10, exclusive of any royalty provided for in subsection 1.

The owner paying for the nonparticipating owner’s share of the drilling and operation of a well may recover from the nonparticipating owner a risk penalty for the risk involved in drilling and completing the well only if the paying owner has made an unsuccessful, good-faith attempt to have the unleased nonparticipating owner execute a lease or to have the leased nonparticipating owner join in and participate in the risk and cost of drilling the well. Before a risk penalty may be imposed, the paying owner must notify the nonparticipating owner with proof of service that the paying owner intends to impose a risk penalty and that the nonparticipating owner may object to the risk penalty by either responding in opposition to the petition for a risk penalty or if no such petition has been filed, by filing an application or request for hearing with the industrial commission.

Source:

S.L. 1953, ch. 227, § 9; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 38-0808; S.L. 1983, ch. 401, § 1; S.L. 1991, ch. 388, § 1; 2003, ch. 306, § 1; 2009, ch. 314, § 1.

38-08-09.
Voluntary agreements for unit operation valid.

An agreement for the unit or cooperative development and operation of a field or pool, in connection with the conduct of repressuring or pressure maintenance operations, cycling or recycling operations, including the extraction and separation of liquid hydrocarbons from natural gas in connection therewith, or any other method of operation, including water floods, is authorized and may be performed and may not be held or construed to violate any of the statutes of this state relating to trusts, monopolies, or contracts and combinations in restraint of trade, if the agreement is approved by the commission as being in the public interest, protective of correlative rights, and reasonably necessary to increase ultimate recovery or to prevent waste of oil or gas. Such agreements bind only the persons who execute them, and their heirs, successors, assigns, and legal representatives.

Source:

S.L. 1953, ch. 227, § 10; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 38-0809.

38-08-09.1.
Legislative finding.

The legislative assembly finds and determines that it is desirable and necessary, under the circumstances and for the purposes hereinafter set out, to authorize and provide for unitized management, operation, and further development of the oil and gas properties to which sections 38-08-09.1 through 38-08-09.16 are applicable, to the end that a greater ultimate recovery of oil and gas may be had therefrom, waste prevented, the drilling of unnecessary wells eliminated, and the correlative rights of the owners in a fuller and more beneficial enjoyment of the oil and gas rights be protected.

Source:

S.L. 1965, ch. 260, § 1.

38-08-09.2.
Power and authority of commission.

The commission is hereby vested with continuing jurisdiction, power, and authority, including the right to describe and set forth in its orders all those things pertaining to the plan of unitization which are fair, reasonable, and equitable and which are necessary or proper to protect, safeguard, and adjust the respective rights and obligations of the several persons affected, and it is its duty to make and enforce such orders and do such things as may be necessary or proper to carry out and effectuate the purposes of sections 38-08-09.1 through 38-08-09.16.

Source:

S.L. 1965, ch. 260, § 2.

38-08-09.3.
Matters to be found by commission — Requisites of petition.

If upon the filing of a petition therefor and after notice and hearing, all in the form and manner and in accordance with the procedure and requirements hereinafter provided, the commission shall find:

That the unitized management, operation, and further development of a common source of supply of oil and gas or portion thereof is reasonably necessary in order to effectively carry on pressure-maintenance or repressuring operations, cycling operations, water flooding operations, or any combination thereof, or any other form of joint effort calculated to substantially increase the ultimate recovery of oil and gas from the common source of supply;

That one or more of said unitized methods of operation as applied to such common source of supply or portion thereof are feasible, will prevent waste, and will with reasonable probability result in the increased recovery of substantially more oil and gas from the common source of supply than would otherwise be recovered;

That the estimated additional cost, if any, of conducting such operations will not exceed the value of the additional oil and gas so recovered; and

That such unitization and adoption of one or more of such unitized methods of operation is for the common good and will result in the general advantage of the owners of the oil and gas rights within the common source of supply or portion thereof directly affected,

it shall make a finding to that effect and make an order creating the unit and providing for the unitization and unitized operation of the common source of supply or portion thereof described in the order, all upon such terms and conditions, as may be shown by the evidence to be fair, reasonable, equitable, and which are necessary or proper to protect, safeguard, and adjust the respective rights and obligations of the several persons affected, including royalty owners, owners of overriding royalties, oil and gas payments, carried interests, mortgagees, lien claimants, and others, as well as the lessees. The petition must set forth a description of the proposed unit area with a map or plat thereof attached, must allege the existence of the facts required to be found by the commission as hereinabove provided and must have attached thereto a proposed plan of unitization applicable to such proposed unit area and which the petitioner or petitioners consider to be fair, reasonable, and equitable.

Source:

S.L. 1965, ch. 260, § 3.

38-08-09.4.
Order — Units and unit areas — Plan of unitization.

The order of the commission must define the area of the common source of supply or portion thereof to be included within the unit area and prescribe with reasonable detail the plan of unitization applicable thereto.

Each unit and unit area must be limited to all or a portion of a single common source of supply.

A unit may be created to embrace less than the whole of a common source of supply only where it is shown by the evidence that the area to be so included within the unit area is of such size and shape as may be reasonably required for the successful and efficient conduct of the unitized method or methods of operation for which the unit is created, and that the conduct thereof will have no material adverse effect upon the remainder of such common source of supply.

The plan of unitization for each such unit and unit area must be one suited to the needs and requirements of the particular unit dependent upon the facts and conditions found to exist with respect thereto. In addition to such other terms, provisions, conditions, and requirements found by the commission to be reasonably necessary or proper to effectuate or accomplish the purposes of sections 38-08-09.1 through 38-08-09.16, and subject to the further requirements hereof, each such plan of unitization must contain fair, reasonable, and equitable provisions for:

The efficient unitized management or control of the further development and operation of the unit area for the recovery of oil and gas from the common source of supply affected. Under such a plan, the actual operations within the unit area may be carried on in whole or in part by the unit itself, or by one or more of the lessees within the unit area as unit operator subject to the supervision and direction of the unit, dependent upon what is most beneficial or expedient. The designation of the unit operator must be by a vote of the working interest owners in the unit in a manner provided by the plan of unitization and not by the commission, and the unit-operating agreement must contain a provision that the owners of a simple majority of the working interest in the unit area may vote to change the unit operator.

The division of interest or formula for the apportionment and allocation of the unit production, among and to the several separately owned tracts within the unit area such as will reasonably permit persons otherwise entitled to share in or benefit by the production from such separately owned tracts to produce or receive, in lieu thereof, their fair, equitable, and reasonable share of the unit production or other benefits thereof. A separately owned tract’s fair, equitable, and reasonable share of the unit production must be measured by the value of each such tract for oil and gas purposes and its contributing value to the unit in relation to like values of other tracts in the unit, taking into account acreage [hectarage], the quantity of oil and gas recoverable therefrom, location on structure, its probable productivity of oil and gas in the absence of unit operations, the burden of operation to which the tract will or is likely to be subjected, or so many of said factors, or such other pertinent engineering, geological, or operating factors, as may be reasonably susceptible of determination. Unit production as that term is used in sections 38-08-09.1 through 38-08-09.16 means and includes all oil and gas produced from a unit area from and after the effective date of the order of the commission creating the unit regardless of the well or tract within the unit area from which the same is produced.

The manner in which the unit and the further development and operation of the unit area shall or may be financed and the basis, terms, and conditions on which the cost and expense thereof shall be apportioned among and assessed against the tracts and interests made chargeable therewith, including a detailed accounting procedure governing all charges and credits incident to such operations. Upon and subject to such terms and conditions as to time and legal rate of interest as may be fair to all concerned, reasonable provision must be made in the plan of unitization for carrying or otherwise financing owners who are unable to promptly meet their financial obligations in connection with the unit and, in addition to the unit expense assessed against each tract and chargeable to each owner, the recovery of a risk penalty from each owner electing not to participate in the unit expense. The recovery of the risk penalty is as follows:

If the nonparticipating owner’s interest in the unit is derived from a lease or other contract for development, the risk penalty is two hundred percent of the nonparticipating owner’s share of the unit expense and may be recovered out of, and only out of, production from the unit, exclusive of any royalty or overriding royalty.

If the nonparticipating owner’s interest in the unit is not subject to a lease or other contract for development, the penalty is fifty percent of the nonparticipating owner’s share of the unit expense and may be recovered out of production from the unit exclusive of any royalty provided for in section 38-08-09.13.

The owner paying for the nonparticipating owner’s share of the unit expense may recover from the nonparticipating owner a risk penalty for the risk involved in the unit expense only if the paying owner has made an unsuccessful, good-faith attempt to have the unleased nonparticipating owner execute a lease or to have the leased nonparticipating owner join in and participate in the risk of the unit expense. Before a risk penalty may be imposed, the paying owner must notify the nonparticipating owner with proof of service that the paying owner intends to impose a risk penalty and that the nonparticipating owner may object to the risk penalty by either responding in opposition to the petition for a risk penalty or if no such petition has been filed, by filing an application or request for hearing with the industrial commission.

The procedure and basis upon which wells, equipment, and other properties of the several lessees within the unit area are to be taken over and used for unit operations, including the method of arriving at the compensation therefor, or of otherwise proportionately equalizing or adjusting the investment of the several lessees in the project as of the effective date of unit operation.

The creation of an operating committee to have general overall management and control of the unit and the conduct of its business and affairs and the operations carried on by it, together with the creation or designation of such other subcommittees, boards, or officers to function under authority of the operating committee as may be necessary, proper, or convenient in the efficient management of the unit, defining the powers and duties of all such committees, boards, or officers and prescribing their tenure and time and method for their selection.

The time when the plan of unitization shall become and be effective.

The time when and conditions under which and the method by which the unit must or may be dissolved and its affairs wound up; however, the unit may be dissolved ten years after the unit agreement becomes effective upon a petition to the commission by the royalty owners who are credited with at least the percentage of interest of the royalty production and proceeds thereof required to ratify the unit agreement on the date the unit agreement was initially approved by the commission, and a subsequent hearing and order by the commission. The commission may not dissolve any unit if the dissolution would be likely to result in waste or the violation of the correlative rights of any owner. This provision does not limit or restrict any other authority which the commission has.

Source:

S.L. 1965, ch. 260, § 4; 1983, ch. 402, § 1; 2001, ch. 55, § 10; 2001, ch. 326, § 1; 2003, ch. 306, § 2; 2017, ch. 253, § 1, effective August 1, 2017.

38-08-09.5.
Ratification or approval of plan by lessees and owners.

At the time of filing of the petition for the approval of a unit agreement and the filing of the unit agreement, the commission shall schedule a hearing. At least forty-five days prior to the hearing, the applicant shall give notice of the hearing and shall mail, postage prepaid, a copy of the application and the proposed plan of unitization to each affected person owning an interest of record in the unit outline, at such person’s last-known post-office address. In addition, the applicant shall file with the commission engineering, geological, and all other technical exhibits to be used at the hearing, and further, the notice must specify that such material is filed and is available for inspection. Service is complete in the mailing of the notice of hearing and unit agreement to each interest owner as described in this section and the filing of an affidavit of mailing with the commission. No order of the commission creating a unit and prescribing its plan of unitization becomes effective until the plan of unitization has been signed, or in writing ratified or approved by those persons who, under the commission’s order, will be required to pay more than fifty-five percent of the costs of the unit operation and by the owners of more than fifty-five percent of the royalty interests, excluding overriding royalties, production payments, and other interests carved out of the working interest, and in addition it is required that when there is more than one person who will be obligated to pay costs of the unit operation, at least two nonaffiliated such persons and at least two royalty interest owners, are required as voluntary parties, and the commission has made a finding either in the order creating the unit or in a supplemental order that the plan of unitization has been so signed, ratified, or approved by lessees and royalty owners owning the required percentage interest. If the plan of unitization has not been signed, ratified, or approved by lessees and royalty owners owning the required percentage interest at the time the order creating the unit is made, the commission shall, upon petition and notice, hold such additional hearings as may be requested or required to determine if and when the plan of unitization has been so signed, ratified, or approved by lessees and royalty owners owning the required percentage interest and shall, in respect to such hearings, enter a finding of its determination in such regard. In the event lessees and royalty owners, or either, owning the required percentage interest have not signed, ratified, or approved the plan of unitization within six months from the date on which the order creating the unit is made, the order ceases to be of further force and effect and shall be revoked by the commission.

Source:

S.L. 1965, ch. 260, § 5; 1983, ch. 403, § 1; 1991, ch. 389, § 1; 2001, ch. 326, § 2; 2017, ch. 253, § 2, effective August 1, 2017.

38-08-09.6.
Unlawful operation.

From and after the effective date of an order of the commission creating a unit and prescribing the plan of unitization applicable thereto, the operation of any well producing from the common source of supply or portion thereof within the unit area defined in the order by persons other than the unit or persons acting under its authority or except in the manner and to the extent provided in such plan of unitization is unlawful and is hereby prohibited.

Source:

S.L. 1965, ch. 260, § 6.

38-08-09.7.
Status and powers of unit — Liability for expenses — Liens.

Each unit created under the provisions of sections 38-08-09.1 through 38-08-09.16 is a body politic and corporate, capable of suing, being sued, and contracting as such in its own name. Each such unit is authorized on behalf and for the account of all the owners of the oil and gas rights within the unit area, without profit to the unit, to supervise, manage, and conduct the further development and operations for the production of oil and gas from the unit area, pursuant to the powers conferred, and subject to the limitations imposed by the provisions of sections 38-08-09.1 through 38-08-09.16 and by the plan of unitization.

The obligation or liability of the lessee or other owners of the oil and gas rights in the several separately owned tracts for the payment of unit expense is at all times several and not joint or collective and in no event may a lessee or other owner of the oil and gas rights in the separately owned tract be chargeable with, obligated or liable, directly or indirectly, for more than the amount apportioned, assessed, or otherwise charged to that person’s interest in such separately owned tract pursuant to the plan of unitization and then only to the extent of the lien provided for within sections 38-08-09.1 through 38-08-09.16.

Any nonsigning working interest owner may withdraw from the unit to which that person’s interest is committed by transferring, without warranty of title, either express or implied, to the unit operator on the behalf of the other working interest owners, all of that person’s working interest in all unit equipment and in all wells used in unit operations. The instrument of transfer must be delivered to the unit operator. Such transfer relieves the withdrawing working interest owner from any liability for unit operations except any incurred pursuant to sections 38-08-09.1 through 38-08-09.16. The interest so transferred is owned by the other working interest owners in proportion to their respective participation in the unit. The unit operator, on the behalf of the other working interest owners, in proportion to their respective interests so acquired, shall pay the transferor for the transferor’s interest in unit equipment and wells the net salvage value thereof as determined by agreement between the transferor and the unit operator. In the event such net salvage value is not agreed upon within sixty days after such transfer, then either party may request a hearing of the matter before the commission, and, after notice and hearing, the commission shall determine such value.

Subject to such reasonable limitations as may be set out in the plan of unitization, the unit has a first and prior lien upon the leasehold production (exclusive of such interests which are free of costs, such as royalties, overriding royalties, and production payments) in and to each separately owned tract, the interest of the owners thereof in and to the unit production in the possession of the unit, to secure the payment of the amount of the unit expense charged to and assessed against such separately owned tract. The interest of the lessee or other persons who by lease, contract, or otherwise are obligated or responsible for the cost and expense of developing and operating a separately owned tract for oil and gas in the absence of unitization, must, however, be primarily responsible for and charged with any assessment for unit expense made against such tract. Any landowner royalty or any overriding royalty, or any production payment which is a part of the unit production allocated to each separately owned tract must in all events be regarded as royalty to be distributed to and among, or the proceeds thereof paid to the royalty owners free and clear of all unit expense and free of any lien thereof.

Source:

S.L. 1965, ch. 260, § 7; 1971, ch. 348, § 1.